California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55671.

The board shall appoint three qualified electors residing in the proposed zone to conduct the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55672.

The election shall be called by posting in three of the most public places in the proposed zone, and by publishing in the county pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, a notice specifying the time, place and purposes of the election, and giving the purposes and boundaries of the proposed zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55673.

The date set for the election shall be at least 13 days after the date of the posting and the date of last publication of the notice. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55674.

The election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this State, where applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55675.

The proposition submitted shall be in accordance with the petition and shall be either:

(a) “Shall the proposed zone described in the resolution of the board of ________ adopted on the ________ day of ________, 19___, be established within County Waterworks District No. ___, and shall the zone incur a bonded indebtedness in the sum of ________ dollars ($________) for the purpose of (stating the purpose for which the amount so raised is to be used)?” or

(b) “Shall the proposed zone described in the resolution of the board of ________ adopted on the ___ day of ________, 19___, be established within County Waterworks District No. ____, and shall special rates or charges for (the use and supply of water or sewage facilities, as the case may be), not to exceed ________, be fixed and collected in the zone for the period of time not to exceed ________, to pay the cost and expense of (describing generally the proposed improvement)?”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

55676.

If 60 percent of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the zone, and of incurring the bonded indebtedness, or fixing and collecting the special rates or charges, as the case may be, the board shall by resolution establish the zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55677.

Upon the establishment of the zone the board shall be authorized and empowered to issue bonds of the zone, or to fix and collect special rates and charges, as voted on at the election, and to proceed with the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55678.

The provisions in this division for the form, issuance, and sale of bonds, the levying and collecting of taxes for the payment thereof and of other matters relating to bonds of the district shall govern in the case of bonds authorized by proceedings under this article except that all taxes for payment of interest and principal on the bonds shall be levied solely upon the taxable property within the zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55679.

The taxes and special rates or charges authorized by this article are in addition to all other taxes and rates or charges authorized by this division, and shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 55108, 55182, and 55702.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Taxes [55700. - 55704.]

55700.

The board of supervisors may in any year levy a tax upon the taxable property in the district, sufficient to pay the cost and expenses of maintaining, operating, extending and repairing the waterworks of the district for the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55701.

The board of supervisors shall levy a tax, each year, upon the taxable property in the district, sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds for that year authorized at the time of formation of the district, and that portion of the principal which is to become due before the time for making the next general tax levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55702.

Where the petition for formation contained a statement that taxes shall be levied only upon the land within the district, all taxes levied under the provisions of this division in a district shall be levied upon the land within the district, and in any extension or additions thereto, and upon no other property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55703.

If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of the bonds is made to begin more than one year after the date of issue, the tax shall be levied and collected each year, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55704.

All taxes pursuant to this chapter shall be levied and collected at the time and in the same manner as the general tax levy for county purposes, and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury to be used for the payment of the principal and interest on bonds, or paid into the county treasury to the credit of the proper fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Claims [55720. - 55720.]

55720.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [55800. - 55801.]



  CHAPTER 1. Inclusion Generally [55800. - 55801.]

55800.

Any portion or portions of a county containing unincorporated territory, or containing the whole or any portion of one or more incorporated cities, and not included in a district, may be added to any district as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55801.

Territory within the same county but not contiguous with the district may be annexed to the district if the board determines that the district resulting from the annexation may be more efficiently and economically operated than if a separate district were formed. No parcel of noncontiguous territory which contains less than 10 acres may be annexed to any district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. REPEALS [55990. - 55991.]

55990.

Chapter 370 of the Statutes of 1913 is hereby repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55991.

The repeal effected by this part shall not be construed to deprive any district or any person or other entity of any substantial right which would have existed or hereafter exists had such repeal not be effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. DRAINAGE [56000. - 56130.]



PART 1. COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICTS [56000. - 56130.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [56000. - 56003.]

56000.

This part shall be known and cited as the “County Drainage District Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56001.

“District” as used in this part means any county drainage district formed pursuant to this part or pursuant to any law which it supersedes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56002.

“District board” as used in this part means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56003.

Districts may be formed, maintained and governed in any county as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation [56010. - 56020.]

56010.

Proceedings for the formation of a county drainage district shall be instituted by the board of supervisors of a county when a petition requesting the institution of such proceedings and signed by the requisite number of owners of real property is filed with the board. The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, each of which must comply with all of the requirements of a petition except as to the number of signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56011.

A petition requesting the institution of proceedings for the formation of a county drainage district shall:

(a) Request the board of supervisors of a county in which the district will be located to institute proceedings to form a county drainage district pursuant to this part;

(b) Describe the boundaries of the territory which is proposed for the district;

(c) Be signed by not less than 100 owners of real property within the proposed district unless the total number of owners of real property within the proposed district does not exceed 200, in which case the petition shall be signed by a majority of such owners. If the board of supervisors finds that the petition is signed by the requisite number of owners of real property residing within the territory to be included within the proposed district, that finding shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56012.

Proceedings for the formation of a county drainage district shall be instituted by the board of supervisors by the adoption of a resolution of its intention to do so. The resolution shall contain all of the following:

(a) A statement of the intention to form the district;

(b) The boundaries of the proposed district or some other designation of its territorial extent;

(c) The name of the proposed district;

(d) The time and place where objections to the formation of the district or to its extent will be heard;

(e) Instructions to the clerk of the board to publish the resolution and notices of hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56013.

The district as formed may include unincorporated or incorporated and contiguous unincorporated territory. The incorporated territory included in the district may include the whole or part of one or more cities. However, the whole or part of a city shall not be included in a district except by the vote of a majority of the governing board of the city. The district shall not include the whole or any part of any other district formed for similar purposes unless the governing body of such other district shall consent thereto and the board of supervisors shall find and determine by resolution duly adopted that the proposed inclusion of the whole or part of such other district is in the best public interest and the territory affected will be benefited thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56014.

The time to be fixed for the hearing of objections to the formation or extent of the district shall be not less than 30 days after the adoption of the resolution of intention to form the district by the board of supervisors. The hearing shall be held at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors or at some place within the proposed district as specified by the board in the resolution of intention to form the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56015.

Prior to the time of hearing, the resolution shall be published at length in the proposed district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. Brief notices of the passage of the resolution and the time and place of the hearing may be published in the proposed district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

56016.

At the time provided in the resolution of intention or at any time to which the hearing is continued, the board of supervisors shall hear any objections to the formation of the district or to its extent. At the hearing the board of supervisors shall exclude any territory that in its opinion will not be benefited by being in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56017.

If written objection to the formation of the district signed by 10 percent of the voters registered in the district is filed with the board of supervisors, it shall, and in any event it may, either adopt an order abandoning the formation of the district or order the matter of the formation of the district with the boundary lines determined at the close of the hearing submitted to the voters of the proposed district at an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56018.

At the election only voters registered in the proposed district may vote. Election precincts shall be established by the board of supervisors, and precinct boards, composed of one inspector, one judge, and one clerk shall be appointed. At least one week prior to the election notice of the election shall be published in the proposed district pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. In other particulars the election shall be conducted in the manner ordered by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

56018.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

56018.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

56018.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

56018.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 257.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

56019.

At the conclusion of the hearing, or if an election is held and the canvass of the election returns shows that a majority of all the votes cast in the entire proposed district were in favor of the formation of the district, the board of supervisors may, if it deems best, make an order forming the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56020.

The order of formation shall contain the name of the district, and a description of the boundaries or otherwise indicate its territory. The order is conclusive evidence of the regularity of all prior proceedings, except the adoption and publication in full of the resolution of intention and of the fact of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Officers [56030. - 56031.]

56030.

The governing body of a county drainage district is a board of directors of not less than five members.

If the district does not include a city or cities or any part thereof, the board of supervisors of the county is the board of directors of the district. If the district includes a city or cities or any part thereof, the members of the board of directors shall be as follows:

(a) The presiding officer of the governing body of each city is a member of the board of directors;

(b) The chairman of the board of supervisors is a member of the board of directors;

(c) A member of the governing body of each city included within the district, other than the presiding officer, as appointed by the governing body of the city is a member of the board of directors;

(d) Two members of the board of supervisors, other than the chairman of the board of supervisors, as appointed by the board of supervisors are members of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56031.

The district board shall have power to fix the amount of compensation per meeting to be paid each member of the board for his or her services for each meeting attended by him or her; provided, that the compensation shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) for each meeting of the district board attended by him or her, together with expenses necessarily incurred by him or her in traveling between his or her place of residence and the place of meeting. However, no member shall receive compensation for attending more than three meetings of the board during any calendar month. This compensation shall be in addition to any other fees or compensation allowed by law for the other official positions specified in Section 56030 that are occupied by members of the district board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. District Powers and Purposes [56040. - 56042.]

56040.

The objects and purposes of a county drainage district shall be to provide for:

(a) The control of storm and other waste waters of or within said district, including waters which arise outside said district and which flow or drain into or through the said district;

(b) The protection from damage by storm or waste waters of private property and of public highways and other public property within said district;

(c) The conservation of storm and waste waters for beneficial and useful purposes by spreading, storing, retaining or causing such waters, or any part thereof, to percolate into the soil within or without said district or the saving and conservation in any manner of any and all of such waters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56041.

A county drainage district shall have the power:

(a) To sue and be sued in its own name;

(b) To adopt a seal;

(c) To take by grant, purchase, gift, lease, devise or otherwise and to hold, use and enjoy real or personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to or convenient for the full exercise of its powers;

(d) To exercise the power of eminent domain to the full extent necessary to or convenient for the full exercise of its powers and to carry out the provisions of this act; provided, that if the exercise of such power requires the alteration or relocation of any facilities devoted to a public use, the cost of such alteration or relocation shall be borne by the district;

(e) To make and accept all contracts, deeds, releases and documents of any kind which will be necessary or proper to the exercise of any of the powers of the district;

(f) To direct the payment of all lawful claims and demands against the district;

(g) To levy and collect taxes as hereinafter provided;

(h) To issue bonds as hereinafter provided and provide for their payment;

(i) To employ such engineers, experts, surveyors, counsel and other persons as are needed to carry into effect any powers of the district;

(j) To acquire, construct, complete, operate and maintain a surface or underground drainage system or systems or combination thereof and such ditches, drains, conduits, pipelines, system of ditches, drains, conduits or pipelines or combinations thereof as may be determined necessary to accomplish the objects and purposes of the district;

(k) Borrow money and incur indebtedness and guarantee the performance of its legal or contractual obligations whether heretofore or hereafter incurred; and also refund or retire any public indebtedness or lien that may exist against the district or any property therein which shall have arisen out of the transaction of the affairs of the district;

(l) To sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any property of the district or any interest therein when it is no longer required for the purposes of the district or when its use may be permitted without interfering with its use by the district;

(m) To do any other act to accomplish the objects and purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56042.

All ordinances of a county drainage district shall be adopted by the board of directors of the district, and shall be certified to, recorded, and published in the same manner as ordinances of a county. The initiative and referendum powers are hereby granted to the electors of a county drainage district to be exercised in relation to the enactment or rejection of ordinances of a county drainage district in accordance with the procedure established by the laws of this state for the exercise of those powers in relation to counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1137, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Preliminary Report and Survey [56050. - 56061.]

56050.

Before constructing any project and before calling any election for the issuance of bonds as hereinafter provided, the district board shall by resolution employ one or more engineers to make a survey of the problems of the district concerning the protection of the lands within the district from storm, overflow or waste waters and especially with reference to the construction of a drainage system or systems. The resolution shall direct the engineer or engineers to prepare and file with the district board a report setting forth:

(a) A general description of the work proposed to be done to carry out the objects of the district;

(b) A general plan and general specifications of the work;

(c) A general description of the property proposed to be acquired or damaged in carrying out the work;

(d) A map showing the boundaries of the district and in general the location and extent of the work proposed to be done, property taken or damaged, and any other information useful to the understanding of the proposed work;

(e) An estimate of the cost of the proposed work including acquisition, engineer and construction costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56051.

The engineer or engineers may, subject to the direction of the district board, employ such surveyors and others as may be necessary to prepare the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56052.

When the engineer’s report is filed, the district board shall examine it and may thereupon:

(a) Reject it and direct that a new report be prepared;

(b) Direct that changes be made in it; or

(c) If it complies with the provisions of this chapter and is satisfactory to the district board, it shall fix a time and place for hearing objections to the report and to doing all or any of the work referred to in the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56053.

Notice of the hearing shall be published by the district board pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper circulated in the district. At the time and place so fixed, or at the time and place to which the hearing may be from time to time continued, the board shall hear all objections. Said objections may be oral or in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

56054.

At the conclusion of the hearing the district board shall either order the report changed to conform to some or all the objections made or shall approve and adopt the report as made. If changes in the report are ordered, a further hearing shall be had upon it as amended and further hearings shall be had until the district board approves and adopts the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56055.

If the district board approves and adopts the report of the engineer or engineers, the board shall order the engineer or engineers to prepare precise plans and specifications for the work contained in said report. Said precise plans and specifications shall be in conformity with the general plans and specifications contained in said report as approved by the district board unless the district board by a four-fifths vote adopts a resolution declaring that the public interest requires a modification of or departure from the general plans and specifications, which resolution shall contain a statement of the manner in which the modification is required or departure is to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56059.

The engineer or engineers employed by the district board to prepare the precise plans and specifications shall be directed by the district board to superintend the doing of the work contained in said precise plans and specifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56060.

A right of way in or across any public highway, street or property in the district is hereby granted to the district wherever the right of way is found by the district board to be necessary or convenient for the doing of any of the work; provided, that if the exercise of the rights herein granted require the alteration or relocation of any facilities devoted to a public use, the district shall pay the cost of such alteration or relocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56061.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, in the event that prior to the formation of a district a report has been secured by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is formed pursuant to the provisions of Section 4.2 of the Drainage District Improvement Act of 1919 concerning the protection of lands and other property within the district from storm or waste waters and containing substantially the same data and matter required by Section 56050 of this chapter, and if copies of said report are made available to the district board by the board of supervisors of such county, a new report need not be prepared by the district board under said Section 56050 and the hearing or hearings referred to in this chapter may be held on such report furnished by the board of supervisors of such county, and thereafter all of the provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to such report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Bonds [56070. - 56090.]

56070.

After the approval and adoption of an engineer’s report and before ordering the engineer to prepare precise plans and specifications as provided in Chapter 5, the district board may submit to the voters of the district the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness to obtain funds with which to acquire the property and to do the work in whole or in part set forth in the report. For that purpose a special election shall be called by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56071.

The resolution shall state all of the following:

(a) The general objects and purposes for which it is proposed to incur an indebtedness.

(b) A reference to the report filed with the district board for particulars. 

(c) The amount of the bonds proposed to be issued; provided, that the district shall not incur any indebtedness which exceeds fifteen percent (15%) of the assessed value of all taxable real property in the district.

(d) The number of years not to exceed which the whole of the bonds are to run. 

(e) The rate of interest or a maximum rate of interest to be paid, which rate shall not be more than the rate specified in this chapter, payable at the time specified in this chapter.

(f) The date of the election.

(g) The election precincts, polling places, and election officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56072.

For the purposes of the bond election the district board may consolidate into one precinct several precincts established for general election purposes and describe the precinct by reference to the general election precincts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56073.

An election board consisting of one inspector, one judge, and one clerk shall be appointed by the district board for each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56074.

Only voters registered in the district are eligible to vote at the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56075.

The resolution calling the election shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper having a general circulation in the district and designated by the district board. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

56076.

If two-thirds of the votes cast are in favor of incurring the bonded indebtedness as proposed, bonds of the district for the amount stated in the resolution calling the election shall be issued and sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56077.

The validity of the bonds after their issuance shall not be questioned in any court except upon the ground that the provisions of this chapter authorizing their issuance are unconstitutional, or that the required hearing regarding the formation of the district was not legally held or proper notice of it was not given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56078.

The district board shall prescribe by resolution the form of the bonds, and interest coupons. The bonds shall be payable at such times and at a place to be fixed by the board, and designated in the bonds, together with interest on all sums unpaid on that date until the whole of the indebtedness has been paid. The term of bonds issued shall not exceed 40 years.

The district board may divide the principal amount of any issue into two or more series and fix different dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of one series may be made payable at different times from those of any other series. The term of bonds of each issue or series shall not exceed 40 years from the date of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------

56079.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the district board determines, except that no bonds shall be of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100) or greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000). They shall be payable on the day and at the place fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified in the bonds, which rate shall not be in excess of 8 percent per annum, and shall, after the first year, be payable semiannually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

56080.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the district board, and countersigned by the auditor of the district, and the seal of the district board shall be affixed. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the auditor of the district. All such signatures and countersignatures may be printed, lithographed, engraved, or otherwise mechanically reproduced, except that one of said signatures or countersignatures to said bonds shall be manually affixed. The auditor of the district under this section shall be the county auditor of the county in which the district is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56081.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature or countersignature shall be as valid as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56082.

The board may issue and sell the bonds of the district at not less than par value, and the proceeds shall be placed in the treasury of the county. Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the legislative body shall give notice not less than 10 days prior to the date of sale by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation circulating in the district inviting sealed bids in such manner as the legislative body shall prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the legislative body determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the legislative body may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

All premiums and accrued interest received shall be paid into the fund to be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the construction fund of the district, and proper records of the transactions shall be placed upon the books of the treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

56083.

The construction fund shall be applied exclusively to the purposes and objects mentioned in the resolution calling the bond election.

Payments from the construction fund shall be made upon the demands allowed by the district board, and prepared, presented and audited in the same manner as demands upon the funds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56084.

When the purposes and objects mentioned in the resolution calling the bond election have been accomplished, any moneys remaining in the construction fund shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56085.

If the proposition of issuing bonds submitted at a bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the district board may, at the expiration of six months after that election, call or order another bond election, either for the same objects and purposes, or for any other object or purpose of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56086.

If bonds have been issued by the district and the proceeds of the sale have been expended, and the district board by resolution passed by a vote of four-fifths of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity of the district demands the issuance of additional bonds for carrying out any of the objects of the district, the district board may again have a report made, and submit to the voters the question of issuing additional bonds in the same manner as for a first issue. All the provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds, and for the expenditure of the proceeds, apply to the issuance of additional bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56087.

Bonds and the interest thereon shall be paid by revenue derived from an annual tax upon the real property in the district, and all the real property in the district shall be and remain liable to be taxed for such payments. Said bonds and the interest thereon shall not be taxable in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56088.
